Maryland, session 2025, HB0496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–739.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Preceptorship program” means an organized system of clinical
experience that, for the purpose of attaining specified learning objectives, pairs a nurse
practitioner student enrolled in a nursing education program that is recognized by the State
Board of Nursing with a nurse practitioner or licensed physician who meets the
qualifications as a preceptor.
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of this section, a nurse practitioner or licensed
physician may claim a credit against the State income tax in the amount stated on the tax
credit certificate issued under subsection (c) of this section for the taxable year in which
the nurse practitioner or licensed physician served without compensation as a preceptor in
a preceptorship program approved by the State Board of Nursing and worked:
(i) a minimum of three rotations, each consisting of at least [100]
90 hours of community–based clinical training; and
(ii) in an area of the State identified as having a health care
workforce shortage by the Department, in consultation with the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–739.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Preceptorship program” means an organized system of clinical
experience that, for the purpose of attaining specified learning objectives, pairs a licensed
practical nurse or registered nurse student enrolled in a nursing education program that is

HOUSE BILL 496 3
recognized by the State Board of Nursing with a licensed practical nurse, advanced practice
registered nurse, or registered nurse who meets the qualifications as a preceptor.
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of this section, a licensed practical nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, or registered nurse may claim a credit against the State
income tax in the amount stated on the tax credit certificate issued under subsection (c) of
this section for the taxable year in which the licensed practical nurse, advanced practice
registered nurse, or registered nurse served without compensation as a preceptor in a
preceptorship program approved by the State Board of Nursing and worked:
(i) a minimum of three rotations, each consisting of at least [100]
90 hours of community–based clinical training; and
(ii) in an area of the State identified as having a health care
workforce shortage by the Department, in consultation with the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board.
Chapter 675 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2022, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December
31, 2021[, but before January 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a
period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2025, Section 2 of this Act, with no further
action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and
effect].
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
8–206.
(b) (3) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE FEE SET BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS
TITLE FOR THE RENEWAL OF A NURSE PRACTITIONER WHO HOLDS AN ADVANCED
PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSE CERTIFICATION, THE BOARD SHALL ASSESS A
SEPARATE $15 FEE FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE NURSE PRACTITIONER, REGARDLESS
OF THE NUMBER OF CERTIFICATIONS HELD BY THE NURSE PRACTITIONER.
(II) THE BOARD SHALL PAY THE FEE COLLECTED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO THE NURSE PRACTITIONER
PRECEPTORSHIP TAX CREDIT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–739 OF THE TAX –
GENERAL ARTICLE.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:

HOUSE BILL 496
Article – Tax – General
10–739.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH.
(3) “LICENSED PHYSICIAN” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED
TO PRACTICE MEDICINE UNDER TITLE 14 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(4) “NURSE PRACTITIONER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–101
OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(5) “PRECEPTORSHIP PROGRAM” MEANS AN ORGANIZED SYSTEM OF
CLINICAL EXPERIENCE THAT, FOR THE PURPOSE OF ATTAINING SPECIFIED
LEARNING OBJECTIVES, PAIRS A NURSE PRACTITIONER STUDENT ENROLLED IN A
NURSING EDUCATION PROGRAM THAT IS RECOGNIZED BY THE STATE BOARD OF
NURSING WITH A NURSE PRACTITIONER OR LICENSED PHYSICIAN WHO MEETS THE
QUALIFICATIONS AS A PRECEPTOR.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, A NURSE
PRACTITIONER OR LICENSED PHYSICIAN MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE
INCOME TAX IN THE AMOUNT STATED ON THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE
NURSE PRACTITIONER OR LICENSED PHYSICIAN SERVED WITHOUT COMPENSATION
AS A PRECEPTOR IN A PRECEPTORSHIP PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE STATE BOARD
OF NURSING AND WORKED:
(I) A MINIMUM OF THREE ROTATIONS, EACH CONSISTING OF AT
LEAST 90 HOURS OF COMMUNITY–BASED CLINICAL TRAINING; AND
(II) IN AN AREA OF THE STATE IDENTIFIED AS HAVING A
HEALTH CARE WORKFORCE SHORTAGE BY THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD.
(2) (I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR MAY NOT EXCEED THE STATE INCOME TAX
IMPOSED FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR.

HOUSE BILL 496 5
(II) ANY UNUSED AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT FOR ANY TAXABLE
YEAR MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER TO ANY OTHER TAXABLE YEAR.
(C) (1) ON APPLICATION BY A NURSE PRACTITIONER OR LICENSED
PHYSICIAN, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A CREDIT CERTIFICATE IN THE
AMOUNT OF $1,000 FOR EACH NURSE PRACTITIONER STUDENT ROTATION OF THE
MINIMUM NUMBER OF HOURS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I) OF THIS
SECTION FOR WHICH THE NURSE PRACTITIONER OR LICENSED PHYSICIAN SERVED
AS A PRECEPTOR WITHOUT COMPENSATION.
(2) THE APPLICATION SHALL CONTAIN:
(I) THE NAME OF THE NURSE PRACTITIONER OR LICENSED
PHYSICIAN;
(II) INFORMATION IDENTIFYING THE PRECEPTORSHIP IN
WHICH THE NURSE PRACTITIONER OR LICENSED PHYSICIAN PARTICIPATED;
(III) THE NUMBER AND NAMES OF THE NURSE PRACTITIONER
STUDENTS FOR WHOM THE INDIVIDUAL SERVED AS A PRECEPTOR WITHOUT
COMPENSATION; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT
REQUIRES.
(3) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT STATED IN
THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MAY NOT EXCEED $10,000.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) APPROVE ALL APPLICATIONS THAT QUALIFY FOR A TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED
BASIS; AND
(II) NOTIFY A TAXPAYER WITHIN 45 DAYS OF RECEIPT OF THE
TAXPAYER’S APPLICATION OF ITS APPROVAL OR DENIAL.
(5) (I) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATES THAT MAY BE ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED THE LESSER OF:
1. THE TOTAL FUNDS IN THE NURSE PRACTITIONER
PRECEPTORSHIP TAX CREDIT FUND FOR THAT YEAR; OR

HOUSE BILL 496
2. $100,000.
(II) IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES
ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION DURING A TAXABLE YEAR TOTAL LESS THAN THE
AMOUNT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, ANY EXCESS AMOUNT MAY BE
ISSUED UNDER TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES IN THE NEXT TAXABLE YEAR.
(D) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE NURSE PRACTITIONER
PRECEPTORSHIP TAX CREDIT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) THERE IS A NURSE PRACTITIONER PRECEPTORSHIP TAX CREDIT
FUND.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO OFFSET THE COSTS OF THE TAX
CREDIT AVAILABLE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(5) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL CONTINUING, NONLAPSING FUND THAT
IS NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(6) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(7) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 8–206 OF
THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE;
(II) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND; AND
(III) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(8) THE MONEY IN THE FUND SHALL BE INVESTED AND REINVESTED
BY THE STATE TREASURER, AND INTEREST AND EARNINGS SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(9) (I) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS PARAGRAPH,
MONEY CREDITED OR APPROPRIATED TO THE FUND SHALL REMAIN IN THE FUND.

HOUSE BILL 496 7
(II) 1. WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE END OF EACH CALENDAR
QUARTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE COMPTROLLER AS TO EACH
CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED DURING THE QUARTER.
2. ON NOTIFICATION THAT A CREDIT CERTIFICATE HAS
BEEN ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE CREDIT AMOUNT STATED IN THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE
FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL:
(1) REPORT TO THE COMPTROLLER ON THE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION DURING THE PRIOR TAXABLE YEAR;
AND
(2) REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE UTILIZATION OF THE
CREDIT ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE GOVERNOR’S
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING THE CRITERIA AND PROCEDURES
FOR APPLICATION FOR, APPROVAL OF, AND MONITORING ELIGIBILITY FOR THE TAX
CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act shall be applicable to the taxable year beginning after
December 31, 2024, but before January 1, 2026.
(b) Section 2 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
(c) Subject to the provisions of Section 6 of this Act, Section 4 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 3 and 4 of this Act
shall take effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 2 of
Chapters 385 and 386 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2016, as amended by Section
3 of Chapters 153 and 154 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2021. If that termination
provision takes effect, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be
interpreted to have any effect on that termination provision.

HOUSE BILL 496
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 6 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.